Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-565
Sections; supplemental to other laws.

Sections 60-501 to 60-569 shall in no respect be considered as a repeal of the state motor vehicle law, but shall be construed as supplemental thereto.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 65, p. 503.